Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 14.11.130.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter may not be construed to prevent a municipality that is a school district or a regional educational attendance area from using other revenue to include additional or expanded facilities as part of approved school construction projects.

History.

(§ 13 ch 147 SLA 1978; am § 10 ch 5 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 43.18.130. Renumbered in 1983.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Appropriations to retire municipal general obligation school bond indebtedness under this chapter are “required” and qualify as an exception to the spending limit of § 16, art. IX, of the state constitution. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 01.

Sec. 14.11.132.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 8 ch 78 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 14.11.140.
Renumbered in 1985.

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

For loss protection, see 4 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 14.11.135.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“approved school construction project” means the plan for a new school or an addition to or major rehabilitation of an existing school to the extent that the plan has been approved by the commissioner under AS

14.07.020(a)(11)

;

“capital improvement project” or “project” means school construction or major maintenance;

“costs of school construction” means the cost of acquiring, constructing, enlarging, repairing, remodeling, equipping, or furnishing of public elementary and secondary schools that are owned or operated by the state, a municipality, or a district and includes the sum total of all costs of financing and carrying out the project; these include the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering, or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of real property and the acquisition of machinery and equipment that may be necessary in connection with the project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project; and the cost of other items, including indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers necessary;

“district” means the districts described in AS

14.12.010

;

“grant” means a grant under this chapter for school construction or for major maintenance;

“major maintenance” means a project described in AS

14.11.013(a)(1)(C)

, (D), or (E);

“school construction” means a project described in AS

14.11.013(a)(1)(A)

, (B), (F), or (G).

History.

(§ 13 ch 147 SLA 1978; am § 48 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch. 78 SLA 1985; am §§ 11, 12 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992; am § 18 ch 78 SLA 1993; am §§ 7, 8 ch 93 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 43.18.135. Renumbered in 1983.

In 1992, former paragraphs (3) and (5) were renumbered as (2) and (3), respectively, to reflect the 1992 repeal of former paragraphs (2) and (4).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 19, 2010, in (6), added “or (E)” and made a related change; in (7), substituted “AS

14.11.013(a)(1)(A)

, (B), (F), or (G)” for “AS

14.11.013(a)(1)(A)

, (B), (E), (F), or (G)”.